src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.xfst.yaml
  Noun - dilijtjåhkanibme: # VSBST-EVEN
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Nom: dilijtjåhkanibme
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Pl+Nom: dilijtjåhkanime
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ill: dilijtjåhkanibmáj
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dilijtjåhkanimásj
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dilijtjåhkanimátjasj
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
#   dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []    # Kommentert ut til vi er ferdige med å sjå på dette leksikonet
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Abe: []
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Nom: dilij-tjåhkanibme
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Pl+Nom: dilij-tjåhkanime
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ill: dilij-tjåhkanibmáj
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dilij-tjåhkanimásj
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dilij-tjåhkanimátjasj
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
#   dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []    # Kommentert ut til vi er ferdige med å sjå på dette leksikonet
    dille+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Abe: []

  Noun - tjåhkanimrámát: # GAHPER
    tjåhkanibme+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Nom: tjåhkanim-rámát
    tjåhkanibme+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ine: tjåhkanim-rámádin
    tjåhkanibme+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ill: tjåhkanim-rámádij
    tjåhkanibme+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Nom: tjåhkanimrámát 
    tjåhkanibme+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ine: tjåhkanimrámádin
    tjåhkanibme+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ill: tjåhkanimrámádij

  Noun - barggogæhttjesiebrre: # MUORRA
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjesiebrre, barggogähttjesiebrre]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: [barggogæhttjesiebre, barggogähttjesiebre]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: [barggogæhttjesæbrráj, barggogæhttjesäbrráj, barggogähttjesæbrráj, barggogähttjesäbrráj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjesæbrásj, barggogæhttjesäbrásj, barggogähttjesæbrásj, barggogähttjesäbrásj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjesæbrátjasj, barggogæhttjesäbrátjasj, barggogähttjesäbrátjasj, barggogähttjesæbrátjasj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjesiebredibme, barggogähttjesiebredibme]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: [barggogæhttjesiebredak, barggogähttjesiebredak, barggogæhttjesiebreda, barggogähttjesiebreda]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttje-siebrre, barggogähttje-siebrre]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: [barggogæhttje-siebre, barggogähttje-siebre]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: [barggogæhttje-sæbrráj, barggogæhttje-säbrráj, barggogähttje-sæbrráj, barggogähttje-säbrráj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttje-sæbrásj, barggogæhttje-säbrásj, barggogähttje-sæbrásj, barggogähttje-säbrásj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttje-sæbrátjasj, barggogæhttje-säbrátjasj, barggogähttje-säbrátjasj, barggogähttje-sæbrátjasj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttje-siebredibme, barggogähttje-siebredibme]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: [barggogæhttje-siebredak, barggogähttje-siebredak, barggogæhttje-siebreda, barggogähttje-siebreda]


  Noun - barggogæhttjijsiebrre: # MUORRA
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjijsiebrre, barggogähttjijsiebrre]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: [barggogæhttjijsiebre, barggogähttjijsiebre]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: [barggogæhttjijsæbrráj, barggogæhttjijsäbrráj, barggogähttjijsäbrráj, barggogähttjijsæbrráj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjijsæbrásj, barggogæhttjijsäbrásj, barggogähttjijsäbrásj, barggogähttjijsæbrásj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjijsæbrátjasj, barggogæhttjijsäbrátjasj, barggogähttjijsäbrátjasj, barggogähttjijsæbrátjasj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjijsiebredibme, barggogähttjijsiebredibme]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: [barggogæhttjijsiebredak, barggogähttjijsiebredak, barggogæhttjijsiebreda, barggogähttjijsiebreda]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjij-siebrre, barggogähttjij-siebrre]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: [barggogæhttjij-siebre, barggogähttjij-siebre]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: [barggogæhttjij-sæbrráj, barggogæhttjij-säbrráj, barggogähttjij-säbrráj, barggogähttjij-sæbrráj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjij-sæbrásj, barggogæhttjij-säbrásj, barggogähttjij-säbrásj, barggogähttjij-sæbrásj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjij-sæbrátjasj, barggogæhttjij-säbrátjasj, barggogähttjij-säbrátjasj, barggogähttjij-sæbrátjasj]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [barggogæhttjij-siebredibme, barggogähttjij-siebredibme]
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    barggogæhttje+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: [barggogæhttjij-siebredak, barggogähttjij-siebredak, barggogæhttjij-siebreda, barggogähttjij-siebreda]

  Noun - juhkkesiebrre: # MUORRA
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkesiebrre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkesiebre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: [juhkkesæbrráj, juhkkesäbrráj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkesæbrásj, juhkkesäbrásj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkesæbrátjasj, juhkkesäbrátjasj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkesiebredibme
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: [juhkkesiebredak, juhkkesiebreda]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: juhkke-siebrre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: juhkke-siebre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: [juhkke-sæbrráj, juhkke-säbrráj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkke-sæbrásj, juhkke-säbrásj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkke-sæbrátjasj, juhkke-säbrátjasj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: juhkke-siebredibme
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: [juhkke-siebredak, juhkke-siebreda]


  Noun - juhkkijsiebrre: # MUORRA
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkijsiebrre]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: [juhkkijsiebre]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: [juhkkijsæbrráj, juhkkijsäbrráj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkijsæbrásj, juhkkijsäbrásj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkijsæbrátjasj, juhkkijsäbrátjasj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkkijsiebredibme]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: [juhkkijsiebredak, juhkkijsiebreda]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkij-siebrre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkij-siebre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: [juhkkij-sæbrráj, juhkkij-säbrráj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkij-sæbrásj, juhkkij-säbrásj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkij-sæbrátjasj, juhkkij-säbrátjasj]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkij-siebredibme
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: [juhkkij-siebredak, juhkkij-siebreda]


  Noun - tjásjrámát: # GAHPER
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Nom: tjásjrámát
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Pl+Nom: tjásjrámáda
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ill: tjásjrámádij
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjásjrámádasj
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjásjrámádattjasj
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjásjrámádahtes
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Abe: [tjásjrámádahtá, tjásjrámádahti]
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Nom: tjásj-rámát
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Pl+Nom: tjásj-rámáda
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ill: tjásj-rámádij
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjásj-rámádasj
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjásj-rámádattjasj
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjásj-rámádahtes
    tjáhtje+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Abe: [tjásj-rámádahtá, tjásj-rámádahti]


  Noun - gåtrámát: # GAHPER
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Nom: gåtrámát
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Pl+Nom: gåtrámáda
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ill: gåtrámádij
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåtrámádasj
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåtrámádattjasj
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gåtrámádahtes
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/ahtes+A+Pl+Nom: [gåtrámádahttá, gåtrámádahttása]
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#rámát+N+Abe: [gåtrámádahtá, gåtrámádahti]
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Nom: gåt-rámát
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Pl+Nom: gåt-rámáda
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ill: gåt-rámádij
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåt-rámádasj
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåt-rámádattjasj
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gåt-rámádahtes
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/ahtes+A+Pl+Nom: [gåt-rámádahttá, gåt-rámádahttása]
    goahte+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#rámát+N+Abe: [gåt-rámádahtá, gåt-rámádahti]
